Hawaii statutes.
§388-6 Withholding of wages. No
employer may deduct, retain, or otherwise require to be paid, any part or
portion of any compensation earned by any employee except where required by
federal or state statute or by court process or when such deductions or
retentions are authorized in writing by the employee, provided that the
following may not be so authorized, or required to be borne by the employee:

(1) Fines;

(2) Cash shortage in a common money till, cash box,
or register used by two or more persons; or cash shortage in a money till, cash
box, or register under sole control if the employee is not given an opportunity
to account for all moneys received at the start of a shift and all moneys
turned in at the end of a shift;

(3) Fines, penalties, or replacement costs for
breakage;

(4) Losses due to acceptance by an employee of checks
which are subsequently dishonored if employee is given discretion to accept or
reject any check;

(5) Losses due to defective or faulty workmanship,
lost or stolen property, damage to property, default of customer credit, or
nonpayment for goods or services received by customer if such losses are not
attributable to employee's wilful or intentional disregard of employer's
interest; or

(6) Medical or physical examination or medical report
expenses which accrue due to services rendered to an employee or prospective
employee, where such examination or report is requested or required by the
employer or prospective employer or required by any law or regulation of
federal, state or local governments or agencies thereof. [L 1963, c 158, pt of
§3; Supp, §95-5; HRS §388-6; am L 1972, c 121, §1; am L 1977, c 90, §1]

Case Notes

Section preempted by ERISA as it "relates to" an
employee welfare benefit plan; FAA-mandated medical exam for pilots was
"medical benefit" within meaning of ERISA employee welfare benefit
plan. 12 F.3d 1498 (1993).

Paragraph (6) requirement that employer pay for medical
examinations mandated by federal agency is preempted by §514(a) of the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act. 807 F. Supp. 1501 (1992).

To the extent that the legislative history of §481B-14 is
relevant to the question of whether employees may sue for unpaid wages under
this section based on violations of §481B-14, that legislative history, as interpreted
by the Hawaii supreme court, provides support for the idea that employees may
do so. 810 F. Supp. 2d 1145 (2011).

Plaintiff resort employees' claim for unpaid wages brought
pursuant to this section was not preempted by section 301 of the Labor
Management Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. §185(a) where there was no need to look to,
much less interpret the collective bargaining agreement (agreement) between
defendant resort and plaintiffs, no need to consult or interpret the agreement,
and defendants presented no evidence that there was a clear and unmistakable
waiver in the agreement, as they are required to, if they seek to assert a
party has waived a state-law right. 818 F. Supp. 2d 1240 (2010).

The legislative history of §481B-14, as interpreted by the
Hawaii supreme court in Davis, allows plaintiff hotel employees to recover for
unpaid service charges imposed without the requisite disclosure set forth in
§481B-14, through a claim brought pursuant to §§388-10 and 388-11 and this
section. 835 F. Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

When a hotel or restaurant applying a service charge
for the sale of food or beverage services allegedly violates §481B-14 by: (1)
not distributing the full service charge directly to its employees as "tip
income" (in other words, as "wages and tips of employees"); and
(2) failing to disclose this practice to the purchaser of the services, the
employees may bring an action under §§388-8 and 388-10 and this section to
enforce the employees' rights and seek remedies. 130 H. 130, 306 P.3d 175
(2013).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next